src/fst/filters/modify-derivations.est.xfscript
# modify stems
# Sirje Mäearu "Sõnamoodustus" http://keeleabi.eki.ee/pdf/095.pdf
# i(k)a gets deleted from foreign word ends:
# onomastika+line -> onomastiline
# apooria + line -> apooriline
# Ibeeria + lane = ibeerlane

# kapitalism + ist -> kapitalist
# -kond + ti -> -konniti
# -lane + nna -> -lanna
# ...maalane + nna -> ...maalanna

define WB [ "#" | .#. ] ;
define MB [ "»" ] ;  # morpheme border
define LI   [ MB l i ];
define LA   [ [MB | {maa}] l a ] ;
define NE   [ [n e] | [s] ] ;
define LINE [ LI NE ];
define LANE [ LA NE ] ;
define IST  [ MB {ist} ] ;
define TI   [ MB {ti} ] ;
define NNA  [ MB {nna} ] ;

# vowel may be upper case, so that if a wowel-initial word starts with a capital letter, 
# the first syllable will get counted; 
# (the initial consonant is optional when counting syllables)
define EstW [ a | e | i | o | u | õ | ä | ö | ü | A | E | I | O | U | Õ | Ä | Ö | Ü] ; 
define WW [ EstW | y | Y];
define EstC [ b | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | r | s | t | v ] ;
define CC [ EstC | c | q | w | x] ;

define SS [CC* WW] ;              # short syllable
define LS [SS [WW | CC] CC*] ;      # long syllable
define Syll [SS | LS] ;

define Pre1  [ Syll CC LS] & ~[?* [l|s]] ;  # NOT biopsia, meelika
define Pre2  [ Syll CC LS]  ;  # NOT biopsia, meelika

define IKA [i (k) a] ;
define IA  [i a] ;
define ISM [i s m] ;
define SE  [s e] ;

define shorten1 [ IKA -> i || Pre1 _ LINE ] ;
define shorten2 [  IA -> 0 || Pre2 _ LANE ] ;
define shorten3 [ ISM -> 0 || _ IST ] ;
define konniti  [   a -> i || k o n n (">") _ TI ];  # not sure if > is actually present here...
define lanna    [  SE -> 0 || LA _ NNA ];

# filter out karl+lik; the only lik-derivation is then karli+lik ???
# (because they both are generated at first...)

define LIK [ MB {lik} \WB*] ;

define CVl [LS l] ;      # 1C word stem ending in l
define CVLIK [ \WB* CVl LIK \WB*] ;   # falsely filters out also Tirool+lik and Iisrael+lik

regex [shorten1 .o. shorten2 .o. shorten3 .o. konniti .o. ~CVLIK .o. lanna] ;
